District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.03a

Misdemeanor insurance fraud.

A person commits the offense of misdemeanor insurance fraud if that person knowingly engages in conduct specified in § 22-3225.02 with the intent to defraud or to fraudulently obtain property of another.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125c-1
as added July 25, 2006, D.C. Law 16-144, § 2(c), 53 DCR 2838

History

This section is referenced in § 16-801.

Section References